North Dakota, session 69, SB2234.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION - DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION - CHOICE
READY GRANTS. There is appropriated out of any moneys in the general fund in the state
treasury, not otherwise appropriated, the sum of $2,000,000, or so much of the sum as may be
necessary, to the department of public instruction for the purpose of providing competitive
choice ready grants to school districts to assist high school students in meeting the
requirements of the state's choice ready framework, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025,
and ending June 30, 2027. The state's choice ready framework must align to the state's
prekindergarten through grade twelve strategic vision that all students will graduate with the
knowledge, skills, and disposition needed to be successful. The department of public instruction
shall create an application and develop selection criteria for grant awards. To be eligible for a
choice ready grant, school districts shall complete a grant application and include information
regarding how grant funds will provide opportunities for students to acquire essential skills and
meet the postsecondary ready, workforce ready, or military ready pathway requirements of the
choice ready framework. School districts may not use choice ready grant funds for general
supplies or equipment. Grant funds must be used to provide students with experiences to
ensure success after high school.
Page No. 1 25.1169.01000